Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act
§ 14-6-234.
Stay of orders pending appeal; securing of payment; staying transfer of legal custody.

If an appeal is taken, an order to pay a fine, costs, support for a child, restitution or any order for the payment of money may be stayed by the juvenile court or by the supreme court pending appeal. The court may require the appellant to deposit with the clerk of court the whole or any part of the payment ordered, to give bond for the payment thereof or any other terms and conditions to secure payment upon final determination of the appeal as the court deems proper. The court may also issue any appropriate order to restrain the appellant from dissipating his assets pending appeal.

Either the juvenile court or the supreme court may stay an order transferring legal custody of a child to a person, agency, organization or institution other than his parents, guardian or former custodian, provided that suitable provision is made for the detention or shelter care of the child pending the appeal.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.35; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-135; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to stay upon appeal, see Rule 62(d), W.R.C.P.

§ 14-6-235.
Fees, costs and expenses.

There is no fee for filing a petition under this act nor shall any state, county or local law enforcement officer charge a fee for service of process under this act. Witness fees, juror fees and travel expenses in the amounts allowable by law may be paid to persons other than the parties who are subpoenaed or required to appear at any hearing pursuant to this act.

The following costs and expenses, when approved and certified by the court to the county treasurer, shall be a charge upon the funds of the county where the proceedings are held and shall be paid by the board of county commissioners of that county:

Witness fees and travel expense;

Jury fees, costs and travel expense;

Costs of service of process or notice by certified mail;

Costs of any physical or mental examinations or treatment ordered by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of counsel appointed by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of a guardian ad litem appointed by the court, unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem; and

Any other costs of the proceedings which would be assessable as costs in the district court.

Legal services rendered to a child for his benefit and protection are necessities which the child’s parents or any person obligated by law for the child’s support may be held responsible. In every case in which a guardian ad litem has been appointed to represent the child under W.S.

14-6-216

or in which counsel has been appointed under W.S.

14-6-222

to represent the child, the child’s parents, guardian or other person responsible for the child’s support, the court shall determine whether the child, the child’s parents, guardian or other person responsible for the child’s support is able to pay part or all of the costs of representation and shall enter specific findings on the record. If the court determines that any of the parties is able to pay any amount as reimbursement for costs of representation, the court shall order reimbursement or shall state on the record the reasons why reimbursement was not ordered. The court may also in any case order that all or any part of the costs and expenses enumerated in paragraphs (b)(i), (iii), (iv) and (vii) of this section, be reimbursed to the county by the child, his parents or any person legally obligated for his support, or any of them jointly and severally, upon terms the court may direct. An order for reimbursement of costs made pursuant to this subsection may be enforced as provided in W.S.

14-6-236

. Any reimbursement ordered for guardian ad litem services provided pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

shall be apportioned between the county and the guardian ad litem program in accordance with payments made for those services.

The department of family services shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing a standard fee schedule for probation services provided under this act. In every case in which a child has been placed on probation under W.S. 14-6-229(d), the court shall determine whether the child, the child’s parents, guardian or other person legally obligated for the child’s support is able to pay part or all of the expenses of probation determined in accordance with the department’s fee schedule and shall enter specific findings on the record. If the court determines that any of the parties is able to pay any amount as reimbursement for expenses of probation, the court shall order reimbursement by any or all of the parties, jointly and severally, or shall state on the record the reasons why reimbursement was not ordered. An order for reimbursement of expenses made pursuant to this subsection may be enforced as provided in W.S.

14-6-236

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.36; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-136; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 107, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to jury fees, see §

1-11-301

et seq.

As to witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b)(vi), inserted “unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem”; and in (c), added the last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Court must inquire into juvenile's ability to pay attorney's fees. —

The court must inquire and find that the juvenile has the ability to pay before the court can order reimbursement of attorney fees. In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

County responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees. —

A guardian ad litem, appointed pursuant to §

14-6-216

, because the interests of the juvenile party's mother were adverse to the interests of the juvenile party, should have been paid by the county for service as a guardian ad litem, and not by the public defender; public defender is responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees only when one is appointed to provide additional representation on the delinquency allegation pursuant to §

7-6-109

.Munker v. Juvenile Court, Seventh Judicial Dist., 837 P.2d 676,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 14-6-236.
Ordering payment for support and treatment of child; how paid; enforcement.

When legal custody of a child, other than temporary guardianship, is vested by court order in an individual, agency, institution or organization other than the child’s parents, the court shall in the same proceeding inquire into the financial condition of the child’s parents or any other person who may be legally obligated to support the child. After due notice and hearing the court shall order the parents or any other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child during the time that a dispositional order is in force. The requirements of W.S.

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

apply to this section. The amount of support shall be determined in accordance with the presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

. In any case where the court has deviated from the presumptive child support, the reasons therefor shall be specifically set forth in the order. The amount ordered to be paid shall be paid to the clerk of the district court for transmission to the person, institution or agency having legal custody of the child or to whom compensation is due. The clerk of court is authorized to receive periodic payments payable in the name or for the benefit of the child, including but not limited to social security, veteran’s administration benefits or insurance annuities, and apply the payments as the court directs. An order for support under this subsection shall include a statement of the addresses and social security numbers if known, of each obligor, the names and addresses of each obligor’s employer and the names and birthdates of each child to whom the order relates. The court shall order each obligor to notify the clerk of court in writing within fifteen (15) days of any change in address or employment. If any person who is legally obligated to support the child does not have full time employment, the court may require that person to seek full time employment and may require community service work in lieu of payment until full time employment is obtained.

An order for the payment of money entered against a parent or other person legally obligated to support a child under the provisions of W.S.

14-6-235

,

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

or this section shall be entered separately from the decree of disposition under W.S.

14-6-229

and shall not be treated as a part of the confidential court record under W.S.

14-6-239

. The order may be filed in the district court of any county in the state. From the time of filing, the order shall have the same effect as a judgment or decree of the district court in a civil action and may be enforced by the district attorney, or the department of family services in the same manner and with the same powers as in other child support cases under W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

,

20-2-311

,

20-2-401

through

20-2-406

and

20-6-101

through

20-6-222

, or in any manner provided by law for enforcement of a civil judgment for money.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 85, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.37; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-137; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1986, ch. 25, § 2; 1987, ch. 127, § 1; ch. 221, § 1; 1988, ch. 26, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; ch. 182, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 202, § 2; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2000, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 34, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2018 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see chapter 17 of title 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), deleted “or any subsequent” preceding “proceeding inquire into the financial condition”; and substituted “district court” for “juvenile court.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “ W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

” for “ W.S.

20-2-303

through

20-2-305

,

20-2-307

.”

This section not applicable. —

This section did not authorize district court to order father to redirect child support payments to adult detention facility where son was incarcerated. Garver v. Garver, 981 P.2d 471,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 14-6-237.
Transfer hearing; transfer of proceedings commenced in district court or in municipal or circuit court.

After a petition alleging a child has committed a delinquent act is filed, the court may, on its own motion or that of any party any time prior to the adjudicatory hearing, order a transfer hearing to determine if the matter should be transferred to another court having jurisdiction of the offense charged for criminal prosecution as provided by law. Notice in writing of the time, place and purpose of the transfer hearing shall be given to the child and his parents, guardian or custodian at least three (3) days before the hearing. The transfer hearing shall be conducted in conformity with W.S.

14-6-222

through

14-6-224

except there shall be no jury.

The court shall order the matter transferred to the appropriate court for prosecution if after the transfer hearing it finds that proper reason therefor exists. The determinative factors to be considered by the judge in deciding whether the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over such offenses will be waived are the following:

The seriousness of the alleged offense to the community and whether the protection of the community required waiver;

Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated or willful manner;

Whether the alleged offense was against persons or against property, greater weight being given to offenses against persons especially if personal injury resulted;

The desirability of trial and disposition of the entire offense in one (1) court when the juvenile’s associates in the alleged offense are adults who will be charged with a crime;

The sophistication and maturity of the juvenile as determined by consideration of his home, environmental situation, emotional attitude and pattern of living;

The record and previous history of the juvenile, including previous contacts with the law enforcement agencies, juvenile courts and other jurisdictions, prior periods of probation to this court, or prior commitments to juvenile institutions;

The prospects for adequate protection of the public and the likelihood of reasonable rehabilitation of the juvenile (if he is found to have committed the alleged offense) by the use of procedures, services and facilities currently available to the juvenile court.

If the court orders the matter transferred under subsection (b) of this section, the court shall state on the record its basis for the decision.

The court may make any necessary orders for the detention of the child until the court to which the matter is transferred has acquired jurisdiction, at which time jurisdiction of the juvenile court with respect to the alleged delinquent act terminates.

Statements made by the child at a transfer hearing are not admissible against him over objection in a criminal proceeding following the transfer.

If the case is not transferred, the judge who conducted the hearing shall not, over objection of an interested party, preside at the adjudicatory hearing on the petition. If the case is transferred to a court of which the judge who conducted the transfer hearing is also a judge, he may be disqualified from presiding at the criminal proceeding.

If any proceeding commenced in the district court is within the concurrent jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the district court may on motion of any party or on its own motion order any proceeding transferred to the juvenile court. The district court judge may, after notice and hearing, find the matter more properly suited to disposition under the provisions of this act. The order of transfer confers upon the juvenile court full jurisdiction in the matter as if originally commenced in the juvenile court.

No court other than the district court shall order the transfer of a case to juvenile court. At any time after a proceeding over which the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction is commenced in municipal or circuit court, the judge of the court in which the proceeding is commenced may on the court’s own motion, or on the motion of any party, suspend further proceedings and refer the case to the office of the district attorney to determine whether a petition should be filed in the juvenile court to commence a proceeding under this act. If a petition is filed under this act, the original proceeding commenced in the municipal or circuit court shall be dismissed. If the district attorney determines not to file a petition under this act, the district attorney shall immediately notify the municipal or circuit court and the proceeding commenced in that court may continue.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.38; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-138; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1984, ch. 67, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (h), deleted “justice of the peace” three times.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Transfer not warranted. —

Trial court did not err by denying defendant’s motion to transfer his case to juvenile court pursuant to the factors because it did not place undue weight on the seriousness of the alleged offense factor after defendant attempted to kill at least nine people at his school. Although defendant had a traumatic upbringing, he escalated from substance abuse and self-harm to attempted first degree murder over the course of a weekend, which meant he posed a threat to society that may not be appropriately managed through probation. Warner v. State, 2021 WY 133, 498 P.3d 1016,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2021).

The district court did not abuse its discretion when it denied a 15-year-old sexual assault defendant's motion to transfer his case to juvenile court, given the fact that the defendant had established himself as an independent, emancipated individual, living and working on his own, and given the serious nature of the crime. Rubio v. State, 939 P.2d 238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1997).

District court did not err in denying a juvenile defendant's motion to transfer his case to juvenile court because the district court's analysis demonstrated that it exercised the appropriate judicial discretion in denying a transfer to juvenile court; the court thoroughly considered the evidence and argument presented and gave suitable weight to defendant's lack of maturity but ultimately concluded that defendant's diminished problem-solving and critical thinking skills paled in light of the maturity and sophistication exhibited in carrying out the planned burglaries. The district court likewise considered defendant's juvenile history and contact with law enforcement and his failure to complete probation and concluded that, while greater rehabilitative services would be available to defendant through the juvenile court, defendant was an unlikely candidate for rehabilitation.
Bear Cloud v. State, 2012 WY 16, 275 P.3d 377,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. Mar. 6, 2012), vacated, 568 U.S. 802, 133 S. Ct. 183, 184 L. Ed. 2d 5, 2012 U.S. LEXIS 7508 (U.S. 2012).

District court
did not err in denying defendant's motion to transfer defendant's
case, in which defendant was charged with murder and other felonies,
to juvenile court because the district court (1) thoroughly reviewed
the relevant statutory factors, and (2) considered defendant's immaturity
and potential for rehabilitation, which were outweighed by defendant's
criminal history and the nature and severity of defendant's alleged
crimes.
Sen v. State, 2013 WY 47, 301 P.3d 106,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2013).

District court correctly interpreted the statutes governing juvenile proceedings, and did not abuse its discretion when it denied defendant's motion to transfer proceedings to juvenile court. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Applied

in

McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Menapace v. State, 768 P.2d 8,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Mullin v. State, 505 P.2d 305,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1973); Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Possibility of rehabilitation as affecting whether juvenile offender should be tried as adult, 22 ALR4th 1162.

Juvenile's guilty or no contest plea in adult court as waiver of defects in transfer or certification proceedings, 74 ALR5th 453.

Application of rule of Dorszynski v. United States requiring that sentencing court make express finding of “no benefit” from treatment under Youth Corrections Act (18 USC § 5005 et seq.), 54 ALR Fed 382.

§ 14-6-238.
Proceedings deemed in equity; effect of orders and decrees.

All proceedings under this act shall be regarded as proceedings in equity and the court shall have and exercise equitable jurisdiction. No order or decree pursuant to this act shall be deemed a conviction of a crime or impose any civil disabilities, nor shall it disqualify the child for any civil or military service application or appointment or from holding public office.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.39; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-139; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Proceedings under this article are special proceedings.

Special proceedings are those which were neither actions in law nor suits in equity under common law, and which may be commenced by motion or petition upon notice for the purpose of obtaining relief of a special or distinct type. State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

And special proceedings result from a right conferred by law,

together with authorization of a special application to the courts to enforce it. State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Applied

in

In re DCP, 2001 WY 77,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 91

, 30 P.3d 29 (Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Salaz v. State, 561 P.2d 238,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1977); McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

§ 14-6-239.
Records and reports confidential; inspection. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Throughout proceedings pursuant to this act the court shall safeguard the records from disclosure. Upon completion of the proceedings, whether or not there is an adjudication, the court shall order the entire file, except for child support orders, and record of the proceeding sealed and the court shall not release these records except as provided in W.S. 14-6-203(g) or

14-6-240

, unless there has been an adjudication of a delinquent act and except to the extent necessary to meet the following inquiries:

From another court of law;

From an agency preparing a presentence report for another court;

From a party to the proceeding;

From the department of family services for purposes of establishing, modifying or enforcing a support obligation.

Upon receipt of inquiries as set out in this section, the court may release a copy of the presentence investigation report together with a cover letter stating the disposition of the proceeding.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 154, § 2.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall limit the disclosure of records authorized by W.S.

7-19-504

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.40; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-140; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 28, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to grounds for denying right of inspection of public records generally, see §

16-4-203

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d), deleted “or 14-6-240(g)” from the end.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, substituted “14-6-604” for “7-19-504” in (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Cited

in

Salaz v. State, 561 P.2d 238,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1977); AMB v. State, 892 P.2d 799,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1995); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

§ 14-6-239.
Records and reports confidential; inspection. [Effective July 1, 2024]

Throughout proceedings pursuant to this act the court shall safeguard the records from disclosure. Upon completion of the proceedings, whether or not there is an adjudication, the court shall order the entire file, except for child support orders, and record of the proceeding sealed and the court shall not release these records except as provided in W.S. 14-6-203(g) or

14-6-240

, unless there has been an adjudication of a delinquent act and except to the extent necessary to meet the following inquiries:

From another court of law;

From an agency preparing a presentence report for another court;

From a party to the proceeding;

From the department of family services for purposes of establishing, modifying or enforcing a support obligation.

Upon receipt of inquiries as set out in this section, the court may release a copy of the presentence investigation report together with a cover letter stating the disposition of the proceeding.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 154, § 2.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall limit the disclosure of records authorized by W.S.

14-6-604

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.40; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-140; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 28, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2022 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 14-6-240.
Fingerprinting or photographing of child; disclosure of child's records. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

No child shall be fingerprinted or photographed by a law enforcement agency or peace officer unless:

The child has been arrested for a felony;

A petition has been filed in juvenile court alleging the child with having committed a delinquent act which would constitute a felony;

Latent fingerprints are found during the investigation of a criminal offense and a peace officer obtains consent of the parent, guardian or custodian of the juvenile, or obtains a court order based upon probable cause to believe the fingerprints are those of the child; or

The child has been adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult.

Fingerprints and photographs of a child adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act which would be a felony if committed by an adult may be retained in a local law enforcement agency file and in the Wyoming division of criminal investigation files in accordance with W.S.

7-19-501

through

7-19-505

. If the matter does not result in an adjudication that the child was a delinquent for having committed an act constituting a felony, the enforcement agency which obtained the fingerprints or photographs pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this section shall destroy those records and shall report the destruction of the records to the court. Further, the court shall order all records pertaining to the matter in the files of law enforcement agencies destroyed or expunged.

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 18, § 2.

Law enforcement records of a child against whom a petition is filed under this act shall be kept separate from records and files of adults and shall not be open to public inspection nor disclosed to the news media without the written consent of the court or except as provided in W.S. 14-6-203(g).

The court or the prosecuting attorney may release the name of the minor, the legal records or disposition in any delinquency proceeding filed in juvenile court to the minor’s victim or victims and the members of the immediate family of any victim. The victim of a delinquent act constituting a felony shall be provided additional information regarding the delinquency proceeding in accordance with W.S.

14-6-501

through

14-6-509

. Except as otherwise allowed under W.S. 14-6-203(g)(i) through (v), legal records released by the court under this subsection shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.

Upon a finding that a release of information will serve to protect the public health or safety or that due to the nature or severity of the offense in question the release of information will serve to deter the minor or others similarly situated from committing similar offenses, the court may release the name of the minor, the legal records or disposition in any delinquency proceeding filed in juvenile court to the media or other members of the public having a legitimate interest. Except as otherwise allowed under W.S.

14-6-203

, legal records released by the court under this subsection shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.41; Laws 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-141; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1979, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 27, § 2; ch. 28, § 1; ch. 115, § 1; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to grounds for denying right of inspection of public records generally, see §

16-4-203

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed former (g), authorizing that the final order or disposition of a juvenile adjudicated as delinquent for commission of a felony be made public except where the minor is seriously emotionally disturbed.

The 2012 amendment,

Deleted “To the extent disclosure is not otherwise authorized under subsection (g) of this section” at the beginning of (e) and (f) and made related change.

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “W.S. 14-6-203(g)(i) through (v)” for “W.S. 14-6-203(g)(i) through (iv)” in (e).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, in the first sentence of (b), substituted “14-6-601” for “7-19-501” and “14-6-606” for “7-19-505.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

§ 14-6-240.
Fingerprinting or photographing of child; disclosure of child's records. [Effective July 1, 2024]

No child shall be fingerprinted or photographed by a law enforcement agency or peace officer unless:

The child has been arrested for a felony;

A petition has been filed in juvenile court alleging the child with having committed a delinquent act which would constitute a felony;

Latent fingerprints are found during the investigation of a criminal offense and a peace officer obtains consent of the parent, guardian or custodian of the juvenile, or obtains a court order based upon probable cause to believe the fingerprints are those of the child; or

The child has been adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult.

Fingerprints and photographs of a child adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act which would be a felony if committed by an adult may be retained in a local law enforcement agency file and in the Wyoming division of criminal investigation files in accordance with W.S.

14-6-601

through

14-6-606

. If the matter does not result in an adjudication that the child was a delinquent for having committed an act constituting a felony, the enforcement agency which obtained the fingerprints or photographs pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this section shall destroy those records and shall report the destruction of the records to the court. Further, the court shall order all records pertaining to the matter in the files of law enforcement agencies destroyed or expunged.

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 18, § 2.

Law enforcement records of a child against whom a petition is filed under this act shall be kept separate from records and files of adults and shall not be open to public inspection nor disclosed to the news media without the written consent of the court or except as provided in W.S. 14-6-203(g).

The court or the prosecuting attorney may release the name of the minor, the legal records or disposition in any delinquency proceeding filed in juvenile court to the minor’s victim or victims and the members of the immediate family of any victim. The victim of a delinquent act constituting a felony shall be provided additional information regarding the delinquency proceeding in accordance with W.S.

14-6-501

through

14-6-509

. Except as otherwise allowed under W.S. 14-6-203(g)(i) through (v), legal records released by the court under this subsection shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.

Upon a finding that a release of information will serve to protect the public health or safety or that due to the nature or severity of the offense in question the release of information will serve to deter the minor or others similarly situated from committing similar offenses, the court may release the name of the minor, the legal records or disposition in any delinquency proceeding filed in juvenile court to the media or other members of the public having a legitimate interest. Except as otherwise allowed under W.S.

14-6-203

, legal records released by the court under this subsection shall not include predisposition studies and reports, social summaries, medical or psychological reports, educational records or transcripts of dispositional hearings.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 127, § 3.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.41; Laws 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-141; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1979, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 117, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 27, § 2; ch. 28, § 1; ch. 115, § 1; 2001, ch. 118, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.